vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Đồ uống > Đồ uống có cồn > Hỗn hợp rượu mạnh & cocktail pha sẵn > Cocktail làm từ rượu vang: Sangria cocktail và hỗn hợp pha cocktail; Hỗn hợp pha rượu vang đá xay; Rượu vang spritz và mimosa cocktail
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Pijače > Alkoholne pijače > Pripravljena žganja in mešanice za koktajle > Koktajli na osnovi vina: Koktajli in mešanice sangrije; Mešanice za zdrobljeni led iz vina; Vinski brizganci in koktajli mimoza
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Bevande > Bevande alcoliche > Liquori premiscelati e miscele per cocktail > Cocktail a base di vino: Cocktail e preparati per sangria; Preparati per granite al vino; Spritz e cocktail mimosa al vino
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Bebidas > Bebidas alcóolicas > Bebidas destiladas pré-misturadas e misturas para coquetéis > Coquetéis à base de vinho: Coquetéis de sangria e misturas; Misturas para raspadinha de vinho; Spritzes de vinho e coquetéis mimosa
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Getränke > Alkoholische Getränke > Vorgemischte Spirituosen und Cocktailmischgetränke > Cocktails auf Weinbasis: Sangria-Cocktails & -Mixgetränke; Wine-Slush-Mixgetränke; Weinschorlen & Mimosa-Cocktails
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Gėrimai > Alkoholiniai gėrimai > Iš anksto sumaišyti spiritiniai gėrimai ir kokteilių mišiniai > Kokteiliai vyno pagrindu: Sangrijos kokteiliai ir mišiniai; Vyno šaltų gėrimų mišiniai; Vyno spritzai ir mimozos kokteiliai
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Beverages > Alcoholic Beverages > Premixed Spirits & Cocktail Mixes > Wine-Based Cocktails: Sangria Cocktails & Mixes; Wine Slush Mixes; Wine Spritzes & Mimosa Cocktails
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Nápoje > Alkoholické nápoje > Předmíchané destiláty a koktejlové směsi > Vinné koktejly: Míchané nápoje a směsi na sangrii; Směsi na vinnou tříšť; Vinné střiky a koktejly mimosa
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Juomat > Alkoholijuomat > Esisekoitetut väkevät alkoholijuomat ja cocktailseokset > Viinipohjaiset cocktailit: Sangriacocktailit ja -sekoitukset; Viinijäähilesekoitukset; Viinispritzit ja mimosat
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Alkollü ve Alkolsüz İçecekler > Alkollü İçecekler > Önceden Karıştırılmış Alkollü İçkiler ve Kokteyl Karışımları > Şarap Bazlı Kokteyller: Sangria kokteylleri ve karışımları; Buzlu şarap karışımları; Şarap spritzleri ve mimoza kokteylleri
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Băuturi > Băuturi alcoolice > Băuturi spirtoase premixate și amestecuri pentru cocteiluri > Cocteiluri pe bază de vin: Cocktailuri și mixuri cu sangria; Amestecuri de granita de vin; Șpriț de vin și cocktailuri mimosa
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 음료 > 주류 > 프리믹스 스피릿/칵테일 믹스 > 와인 베이스 칵테일: 샹그리아 칵테일 및 믹스; 와인 슬러시 믹스; 와인 스프리츠 및 미모사 칵테일
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Напитки > Алкохолни напитки > Готови спиртни напитки и смеси за коктейли > Коктейли на винена основа: Коктейли и миксове сангрия; Смеси за ледена напитка от вино; Мимоза и винени коктейли
th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > เครื่องดื่ม > เครื่องดื่มที่มีแอลกอฮอล์ > สุราผสมล่วงหน้าและค็อกเทลมิกซ์ > ค็อกเทลจากไวน์: แซงเกรียค็อกเทลและส่วนผสม; ส่วนผสมไวน์เกล็ดหิมะ; ไวน์สปริตเซอร์และค็อกเทลมิโมซ่า
fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Boissons > Boissons alcoolisées > Spiritueux prêts à boire et mélanges pour cocktails > Cocktails à base de vin: Cocktails et préparations pour sangria; Préparations pour granités au vin; Cocktails spritz et mimosas au vin
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Bebidas > Bebidas alcoólicas > Bebidas espirituosas pré-misturadas e misturas de cocktail > Cocktails à base de vinho: Cocktails e misturas para sangria; Misturas para granizados de vinho; Spritzes de vinho e mimosas
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 飲料 > 酒精飲料 > 預調酒和調製雞尾酒 > 葡萄酒雞尾酒: 桑格利亞調酒與預調酒; 葡萄酒冰沙調酒包; 葡萄酒氣泡飲與含羞草調酒
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Pića > Alkoholna pića > Gotova alkoholna pića i mješavine za koktele > Kokteli na bazi vina: Kokteli i mješavine sangrije; Mješavine za slushy s vinom; Vinski špriceri i kokteli od mimoze
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Nápoje > Alkoholické nápoje > Predmiešané liehoviny a koktailové zmesi > Vínové koktaily: Koktaily a mixy zo sangrie; Vínna ľadová triešť; Vínne striky a mimózové kokteily
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Drikkevarer > Alkoholholdige drikkevarer > Ferdigblandede brennevins- og cocktailmikser > Vinbaserte cocktailer: Sangriacocktailer og blandinger; Vin-slush-blandinger; Vinspritzere og mimosacocktailer
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Napoje > Napoje alkoholowe > Gotowe mieszanki alkoholowe i koktajlowe > Koktajle na bazie wina: Koktajle i miksy sangria; Mieszanki do mrożonych winnych drinków; Szprycery winne i koktajle z mimozą
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 饮料/饮品 > 酒精饮料 > 预调烈酒和混合鸡尾酒 > 葡萄酒鸡尾酒: 桑格利亚鸡尾酒与预调酒; 葡萄酒冰沙预调酒; 气泡葡萄酒与含羞草鸡尾酒
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Bebidas > Bebidas alcohólicas > Licores premezclados y mezclas para cócteles > Cócteles a base de vino: Cócteles y mezclas de sangría; Mezclas para granizados de vino; Spritz de vino y cócteles mimosa
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Напитки > Алкогольные напитки > Алкогольные коктейли и смеси для коктейлей > Коктейли на основе вина: Сангрия и смеси для сангрии; Смеси для винного слаша; Винные спреи и коктейли «Мимоза»
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Ποτά > Αλκοολούχα ποτά > Έτοιμα μείγματα αλκοολούχων ποτών και κοκτέιλ > Κοκτέιλ με βάση το κρασί: Κοκτέιλ και μείγματα σαγκρία; Μείγματα για γρανίτα κρασιού; Spritz κρασιού και κοκτέιλ μιμόζα
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Drycker > Alkoholhaltiga drycker > Sprit- och cocktailblandningar > Vinbaserade cocktails: Sangriadrycker och -mixer; Vinslush-mixer; Vinspritzer och mimosa-drinkar
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Drinken > Alcoholische dranken > Voorgemixte sterke dranken en mixen voor cocktails > Cocktails op basis van wijn: Sangriacocktails en -mixen; Wijnslushmixen; Wijnspritzers en mimosacocktails
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Italok > Alkoholos italok > Előkevert szeszes italok és koktélkeverékek > Bor alapú koktélok: Sangria koktélok és keverékek; Borjégkása keverékek; Fröccsök és mimóza koktélok
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Drikkevarer > Alkoholiske drikke > Forblandet spiritus og cocktailblandinger > Vin-baserede cocktails: Sangriacocktails og -mix; Vinslush-mix; Wine spritz og mimosa-cocktails
ja: 食品・飲料 > 飲料 > アルコール飲料 > プレミックススピリッツ・カクテルミックス > ワインベースのカクテル: サングリアカクテル・ミックス; ワインスラッシュミックス; ワインスプリッツ・ミモザカクテル